Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Virginia Racing Commission.
§ 59.1-371.
Fingerprints and background investigations; investigations from other states.

The Commission shall fingerprint and require a background investigation to include a criminal history record information check of the following persons to be conducted by a representative of a law-enforcement agency of the Commonwealth or federal government:
(i) every person licensed to hold race meetings within the Commonwealth of Virginia; (ii) every person who is an officer or director or principal stockholder of a corporation which holds such a license, and every employee of the
holder of any such license whose duties relate to the horse racing business in Virginia; (iii) all security personnel of any license holder; (iv) members and employees of the Virginia Racing Commission; (v) all permit holders,
owners, trainers, jockeys, apprentices, stable employees, managers, agents, blacksmiths, veterinarians, employees of any license or permit holder; and (vi) any person who actively participates in the racing activities of any license
or permit holder.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the Commission may, (i) by regulation, establish a procedure to recognize a license or permit issued by another state in which horse racing is authorized when the Commission in its discretion determines
that the laws or requirements of the licensing authority for such state governing fingerprinting and background investigations are substantially the same as required under this chapter and Commission regulations, and that the applicant
has not been convicted of an offense as provided in subsection C of § 59.1-389 and (ii) waive the requirements for fingerprints and background investigations for permit holders participating in (a) horse racing in nonsecure areas
or (b) nonracing activities.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1990, c. 774; 1991, c. 591; 1995, c. 370; 1998, c. 619; 2000, c. 1011.

Editor’s note.

In subsection B, the language “convicted of an offense as provided in subsection C of § 59.1-389” was substituted for “convicted of a misdemeanor or felony as provided in subdivision B 6 of § 59.1-389” at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission
to conform to changes by Acts 1999, c. 356.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1011 added the clause (i) designation and the language beginning “and (ii) waive” and ending “nonracing activities” in subsection B.

§ 59.1-372.
Virginia Breeders Fund.

There is hereby created within the State Treasury the Virginia Breeders Fund, which Fund, together with the interest thereon, shall be administered in whole or in part by the Commission or by an entity designated by the Commission. The cost of administering
and promoting the Fund shall be deducted from the Fund, and the balance shall be disbursed by the Commission or designated entity to the breeders of Virginia-bred horses that win races at race meetings designated by the Commission,
to the owners of Virginia sires of Virginia-bred horses that win races at race meetings designated by the Commission, to the owners of Virginia-bred horses that win or earn purse money in nonrestricted races at racetracks in Virginia
licensed by the Commission, to the owners of Virginia-bred horses that win races at race meetings designated by the Commission and for purses for races restricted to Virginia-bred or Virginia-sired horses or both at race meetings designated
by the Commission. To assist it in establishing this awards and incentive program to foster the industry of breeding racehorses in Virginia, the Commission shall appoint an advisory committee composed of two members from each of the
registered breed associations representing each breed of horse participating in the Fund program, one member representing the owners and operators of racetracks and one member representing all of the meets sanctioned by the National
Steeplechase Association.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1993, c. 146; 1997, c. 798; 2002, c. 852.

Cross references.

As to agency action related to the Fund being exempt from the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4002

.

As to the authority of the Commission to designate an entity to administer and promote the Virginia Breeders Fund without competitive procurement, see §

2.2-4346

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 852, effective April 17, 2002, in the second sentence, inserted “or earn purse money in” preceding “nonrestricted,” inserted “to the owners of Virginia-bred horses that win races at race meetings designated by the Commission”
preceding “and for purses,” “or Virginia-sired,” following “restricted to Virginia-bred,” and “or both” preceding “at race meetings.”

§ 59.1-373.
Hearing and appeal.

Any person aggrieved by a refusal of the Commission to issue any license or permit, the suspension or revocation of a license or permit, the imposition of a fine, or any other action of the Commission, may seek review of such action in accordance with
Article 5 of the Administrative Process Act in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond. Further appeals shall also be in accordance with Article 5 (§

2.2-4025

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1996, c. 573.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 573, cl. 2, provides: “[t]hat the provisions of this act shall not apply to any agency action or the review of any agency action commenced prior to July 1, 1996.”

§ 59.1-374.
Injunction.

Whenever it appears to the Commission that any person has violated or may violate any provision of this chapter or any regulation or final decision of the Commission, it may apply to the appropriate circuit court for an injunction against such person.
The order granting or refusing such injunction shall be subject to appeal as in other cases in equity.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1998, c. 619.